Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.25
Misbranded commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance; distribution unlawful; how determined.

No person shall distribute any misbranded commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance. A commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance shall be deemed to be misbranded if:

(1) Its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

(2) It is distributed under the name of another commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance;

(3) It is not labeled as required by the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act;

(4) It purports to be or is represented as a commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance or as containing an ingredient, for which a definition of identity or standard of quality has been prescribed by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department, unless it conforms to such definition and standard; or

(5) Any word, statement, or other information required by the act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act to appear on the label is not prominently displayed with such conspicuousness, as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, on the label, and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by an individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

Laws 1975, LB 333, § 10;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 41;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 31.
March 17, 2026